Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2917
Program proposal; approvals required.

If the subdivision of local government has adopted a community development plan for an area which includes the area in which the community betterment organization is providing community assistance or community services, the organization shall submit a copy of the program proposal to the chief executive officer of such subdivision. If the program proposal is consistent with the adopted community development plan, the chief executive officer shall so certify to the department for the department's approval or disapproval. If the program proposal is not consistent with the adopted community development plan of the local subdivision, the chief executive officer shall so indicate and the proposal shall not be approved by the department. If the proposed activities are consistent with the adopted community development plan, but for other reasons they are not viewed as appropriate by the local subdivision, the chief executive officer shall so indicate and the department shall review the program proposal and approve or disapprove it. The local subdivision shall review the proposal within forty-five days from the date of receipt for review. If the subdivision does not issue its finding concerning the proposal within forty-five days after receipt, the proposal shall be deemed approved. The department shall approve or disapprove a program proposal submitted pursuant to section 77-2916 within forty-five days of receipt by the department.

Laws 2025, LB650, § 5.